Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,239.08
Civil action against provider of medical or dental services; Attorney General; represent; indemnification of provider.

Any person who, at the request of the director of a state agency, provides medical or dental services to a person in the custody of the state may be represented by the Attorney General in the same manner as a state officer or employee under sections 81-8,239.05 and 81-8,239.06 in any civil action under the federal Civil Rights Act of 1871, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 1983, which arose as a result of providing such services. A person providing such services shall also be indemnified for liability for violations of civil rights in the same manner as a state officer or employee under section 81-8,239.05.

Laws 1992, LB 560, § 1.